tsz.twol
Alphabet 

a b c d e g i ï j  k l m n h o p r s t  u w x y '

%{t%}:t 
%{t%}:d
%{j%}:j %{j%}:0
%{a%}:' %{a%}:0
;

Sets

Nas = m n ;
Ocl = p t k ;
Voc = a e i o u ï;

Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Sonorización de oclusivas"

Ox:Sx <=> Nas: %>: _ ;
        where Ox in Ocl
              Sx in (b d g) matched ;

"Preaspiracion de oclusivas"

%{j%}:j <=> Voc: %>: _ [ t: s:|  k: w:  | p:  | t:  | k: | c: h: ]  %{a%}: Voc: ;

"Delete aspiration in untervoc context"
%{a%}:0 <=> %{j%}: [ t: s:|  k: w:  | p:  | t:  | k: | c: h: ] _ Voc: ;





! s a p i i x k a > {j} t s  ' ï
!  s a p i i x k a > j   t s 0  ï
